South Dakota, session 2026, HB1038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 49-34A:
The commission may assess a customer of a public utility the actual costs
associated with processing a request for approval of a contract with deviations, or other
electric service agreement with a public utility, related to the provision of electric service
to a customer that is a data center with a peak demand of ten megawatts or greater.
The commission shall forward any moneys collected under this section to the state
treasurer, for deposit in the South Dakota Public Utilities Commission gross receipts tax
fund established in § 49-1A-2.
For the purposes of this section, "data center" means a centralized repository for
the primary purpose of storage, management, dissemination, and processing of electronic
data and information, including the mining of digital currency.

26.624.17 2 1038
An Act to allow the Public Utilities Commission to assess actual costs to data centers that are
customers of public utilities.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1038
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1038 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1038 ENROLLED